fdic-to-hunspell/resultat/dictionaries.catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: convèncer
SFX 3C Y 71
SFX 3C r r/_C_Y er
SFX 3C èncer éncer/_C_Y er
SFX 3C èncer encent/_C er
SFX 3C èncer ençut/_V_Y er
SFX 3C èncer ençuda/_Y er
SFX 3C èncer ençuts/_Y er
SFX 3C èncer ençudes/_Y er
SFX 3C èncer enço/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enç/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer ences/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enç/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encen/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encia/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encies/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encia/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encíem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encíeu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encien/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encí/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceres/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encé/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encérem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encéreu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceren/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceré/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceràs/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encerà/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encerem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encereu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceran/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceria/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceries/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceria/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceríem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceríeu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encerien/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer ença/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enci/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer ences/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encis/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer ença/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enci/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encen/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encin/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encés/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encera/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encessis/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceres/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encesses/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encés/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encera/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encéssim/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encérem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encéssem/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encéssiu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encéreu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encésseu/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encessin/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enceren/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer encessen/_Z er
SFX 3C èncer enç/_C er
SFX 3C èncer ença/_D er
SFX 3C èncer enci/_D er
SFX 3C èncer encem/_C er
SFX 3C èncer enceu/_C er
SFX 3C èncer encen/_C er
SFX 3C èncer encin/_C er
# Model de conjugació: conviure
SFX 3D Y 69
SFX 3D e e/_D_Y re
SFX 3D ure vint/_C re
SFX 3D ure scut/_V_Y re
SFX 3D ure scuda/_Y re
SFX 3D ure scuts/_Y re
SFX 3D ure scudes/_Y re
SFX 3D ure sc/_Z re
SFX 3D re s/_Z re
SFX 3D re 0/_Z re
SFX 3D ure vim/_Z re
SFX 3D ure viu/_Z re
SFX 3D re en/_Z re
SFX 3D ure via/_Z re
SFX 3D ure vies/_Z re
SFX 3D ure via/_Z re
SFX 3D ure víem/_Z re
SFX 3D ure víeu/_Z re
SFX 3D ure vien/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squí/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squeres/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squé/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squérem/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squéreu/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squeren/_Z re
SFX 3D e é/_Z re
SFX 3D e às/_Z re
SFX 3D e à/_Z re
SFX 3D e em/_Z re
SFX 3D e eu/_Z re
SFX 3D e an/_Z re
SFX 3D e ia/_Z re
SFX 3D e ies/_Z re
SFX 3D e ia/_Z re
SFX 3D e íem/_Z re
SFX 3D e íeu/_Z re
SFX 3D e ien/_Z re
SFX 3D ure sca/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squi/_Z re
SFX 3D ure sques/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squis/_Z re
SFX 3D ure sca/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squi/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squem/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squeu/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squen/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squin/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squés/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squera/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squessis/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squeres/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squesses/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squés/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squera/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squéssim/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squérem/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squéssem/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squéssiu/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squéreu/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squésseu/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squessin/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squeren/_Z re
SFX 3D ure squessen/_Z re
SFX 3D re 0/_C re
SFX 3D ure sca/_D re
SFX 3D ure squi/_D re
SFX 3D ure squem/_C re
SFX 3D ure viu/_C re
SFX 3D ure squen/_C re
SFX 3D ure squin/_C re
# Model de conjugació: cosir
SFX 3E Y 73
SFX 3E r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 3E r nt/_C ir
SFX 3E r t/_V_Y ir
SFX 3E r da/_Y ir
SFX 3E r ts/_Y ir
SFX 3E r des/_Y ir
SFX 3E osir uso/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir us/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir uses/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir us/_Z ir
SFX 3E r m/_Z ir
SFX 3E r u/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usen/_Z ir
SFX 3E r a/_Z ir
SFX 3E r es/_Z ir
SFX 3E r a/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 3E r en/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir í/_Z ir
SFX 3E r res/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir í/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ren/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ré/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 3E r rà/_Z ir
SFX 3E r rem/_Z ir
SFX 3E r reu/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ran/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ria/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ries/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ria/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 3E r rien/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usa/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usi/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir uses/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usis/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usa/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usi/_Z ir
SFX 3E r m/_Z ir
SFX 3E r guem/_Z ir
SFX 3E r u/_Z ir
SFX 3E r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usen/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir usin/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ra/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 3E r res/_Z ir
SFX 3E r sses/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ra/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 3E ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ren/_Z ir
SFX 3E r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 3E osir us/_C ir
SFX 3E osir usa/_D ir
SFX 3E osir usi/_D ir
SFX 3E r m/_C ir
SFX 3E r guem/_C ir
SFX 3E r u/_C ir
SFX 3E osir usen/_C ir
SFX 3E osir usin/_C ir
# Model de conjugació: coure
SFX 3F Y 73
SFX 3F e e/_D_Y re
SFX 3F ure ent/_C re
SFX 3F ure gut/_V_Y re
SFX 3F oure uit/_V_Y re
SFX 3F ure guda/_Y re
SFX 3F oure uita/_Y re
SFX 3F ure guts/_Y re
SFX 3F oure uits/_Y re
SFX 3F ure gudes/_Y re
SFX 3F oure uites/_Y re
SFX 3F ure c/_Z re
SFX 3F re s/_Z re
SFX 3F re 0/_Z re
SFX 3F ure em/_Z re
SFX 3F ure eu/_Z re
SFX 3F re en/_Z re
SFX 3F ure ïa/_Z re
SFX 3F ure ïes/_Z re
SFX 3F ure ïa/_Z re
SFX 3F ure íem/_Z re
SFX 3F ure íeu/_Z re
SFX 3F ure ïen/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guí/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gué/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 3F e é/_Z re
SFX 3F e às/_Z re
SFX 3F e à/_Z re
SFX 3F e em/_Z re
SFX 3F e eu/_Z re
SFX 3F e an/_Z re
SFX 3F e ia/_Z re
SFX 3F e ies/_Z re
SFX 3F e ia/_Z re
SFX 3F e íem/_Z re
SFX 3F e íeu/_Z re
SFX 3F e ien/_Z re
SFX 3F ure ga/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gui/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gues/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guis/_Z re
SFX 3F ure ga/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gui/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guem/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gueu/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guen/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guin/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gués/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guera/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guessis/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gueres/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guesses/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gués/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guera/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guéssim/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guérem/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guéssem/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guéssiu/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guéreu/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guésseu/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guessin/_Z re
SFX 3F ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 3F ure guessen/_Z re
SFX 3F re 0/_C re
SFX 3F ure ga/_D re
SFX 3F ure gui/_D re
SFX 3F ure guem/_C re
SFX 3F ure eu/_C re
SFX 3F ure guen/_C re
SFX 3F ure guin/_C re
# Model de conjugació: crear
SFX 40 Y 84
SFX 40 r r/_C_Y ar
SFX 40 r nt/_C ar
SFX 40 r t/_V_Y ar
SFX 40 r da/_Y ar
SFX 40 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 40 r des/_Y ar
SFX 40 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 40 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 40 r m/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 40 r u/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 40 r va/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 40 r va/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 40 r res/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 40 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 40 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 40 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 40 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar ïs/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar ïn/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 40 r res/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 40 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 40 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 40 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 40 r 0/_D ar
SFX 40 ar e/_D ar
SFX 40 ar ï/_D ar
SFX 40 ar em/_C ar
SFX 40 r u/_C ar
SFX 40 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 40 ar en/_C ar
SFX 40 ar ïn/_C ar
# Model de conjugació: cruixir
SFX 41 Y 73
SFX 41 r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 41 r nt/_C ir
SFX 41 r t/_V_Y ir
SFX 41 r da/_Y ir
SFX 41 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 41 r des/_Y ir
SFX 41 ir o/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 41 r m/_Z ir
SFX 41 r u/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 41 r a/_Z ir
SFX 41 r es/_Z ir
SFX 41 r a/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 41 r en/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 41 r res/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 41 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 41 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 41 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 41 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir a/_Z ir
SFX 41 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 41 r s/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir a/_Z ir
SFX 41 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 41 r m/_Z ir
SFX 41 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 41 r u/_Z ir
SFX 41 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 41 r n/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 41 r res/_Z ir
SFX 41 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 41 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 41 ir 0/_C ir
SFX 41 ir a/_D ir
SFX 41 r 0/_D ir
SFX 41 r m/_C ir
SFX 41 r guem/_C ir
SFX 41 r u/_C ir
SFX 41 ir en/_C ir
SFX 41 r n/_C ir
# Model de conjugació: dar
SFX 42 Y 66
SFX 42 r r/_C_Y ar
SFX 42 r nt/_C ar
SFX 42 r t/_V_Y ar
SFX 42 r da/_Y ar
SFX 42 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 42 r des/_Y ar
SFX 42 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 42 r m/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 42 r u/_Z ar
SFX 42 r va/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 42 r va/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 42 r res/_Z ar
SFX 42 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 42 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 42 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 42 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 42 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 42 r s/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 42 r res/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 42 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 42 r s/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 42 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 42 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 42 r 0/_D ar
SFX 42 ar em/_C ar
SFX 42 r u/_C ar
SFX 42 ar eu/_C ar
